Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB846.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5542 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5542. Animal mutilation and related offenses.* * *(e.1) Declawing of cats.--(1) A person commits an offense under section 5533 if the person performs a declawing procedure that is not deemed necessary for a therapeutic purpose by a licensed doctor of veterinary medicine.(2) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a violation of this subsection constitutes a summary offense punishable as follows:123456789101112131415161718 (i) for a first offense, by a fine of not less than $50 and not more than $750;(ii) for a second offense, by a fine of not less than $150 and not more than $1,000; or(iii) for a third or subsequent offense, by a fine of not less than $500 and not more than $1,500.(3) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under section 5533 or 5534 (relating to aggravated cruelty to animal).(4) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Declawing." The term:(i) Includes:(A) An onychectomy, dactylectomy, partial digital amputation, phalangectomy or any other procedure that removes a portion of the paw or digit of an animal in order to remove a claw.(B) A tendonectomy or any other procedure that cuts or modifies the tendon of the limb, paw or digit of an animal in order to prohibit the normal function of a claw.(C) A procedure that prevents the normal functioning of one or more claws.(ii) Does not include the filing or trimming of a nonviable claw husk or the placement of temporary nail caps on one or more claws of an animal."Therapeutic purpose." A purpose necessary to address an existing or recurring physical illness, infection, disease, injury or abnormal condition in a claw, nail bed or toe bone 20250SB0846PN0938 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that compromises the cat's health. The term does not include cosmetic or aesthetic reasons or reasons of convenience in keeping or handling the cat.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0846PN0938 - 3 - 12345